Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1051
Attachment order in actions on claims not due; refusal requires dismissal of action.

If the court or judge refuse to grant an order of attachment as provided in sections 25-1049 and 25-1050, the action shall be dismissed, but without prejudice to a future action; and in all such actions application for an attachment must be made.

R.S.1867, Code § 239, p. 433;

R.S.1913, § 7780;

C.S.1922, § 8724;

C.S.1929, § 20-1051;

R.S.1943, § 25-1051.

Dissolution of attachment terminates main action. Dayton Spice-Mills Co. v. Sloan, 49 Neb. 622, 68 N.W. 1040 (1896).

Action depends upon attachment. Cox & Cornell v. Peoria Mfg. Co., 42 Neb. 660, 60 N.W. 933 (1894).